Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.920

Effective date—1971 ex.s. c 252.

This act shall become effective May 1, 1972: PROVIDED, That the director is authorized and empowered to undertake and perform duties and conduct activities necessary for the implementation of this act prior to that date.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 252 s 30.]